Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 10 Patient Centered and Family Focused Palliative Care

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 738, § 19, effective April 9, 1993, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this article. The former article consisted of Code Sections 31-7-190 through 31-7-208, relating to the Hospital Financing Authority, and was based on Ga. L. 1984, p. 1654, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1519, §§ 1-5; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 31; Ga. L. 1990, p. 894, §§ 1-11; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 31; and Ga. L. 1992, p. 1323, §§ 1, 1.5, 2.

31-7-190.
Legislative intent.

The intent of the General Assembly in enacting this article is to improve quality and delivery of patient centered and family focused palliative care in this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-190

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 155, § 1/HB 509.

31-7-191.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of community health.

“Department” means the Department of Community Health.

“Georgia Palliative Care and Quality of Life Advisory Council” or “council” means the advisory council created pursuant to Code Section 31-7-192.

“Health care facility” means hospitals; other special care units, including but not limited to podiatric facilities; skilled nursing facilities; intermediate care facilities; assisted living communities; personal care homes; ambulatory surgical or obstetrical facilities; health maintenance organizations; home health agencies; and diagnostic, treatment, or rehabilitation centers.

“Palliative care” means those interventions which are intended to alleviate suffering and to achieve relief from, reduction of, or elimination of pain and of other physical, emotional, social, or spiritual symptoms of distress to achieve the best quality of life for the patients and their families.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-191

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 155, § 1/HB 509.

31-7-192.
Georgia Palliative Care and Quality of Life Advisory Council.

There is hereby created the Georgia Palliative Care and Quality of Life Advisory Council within the department. The council shall be composed of nine members, as follows:

The chairperson of the House Committee on Health and Human Services, or his or her designee;

The chairperson of the Senate Health and Human Services Committee, or his or her designee;

Two members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;

Two members appointed by the President of the Senate; and

Three members appointed by the Governor.

The appointing authorities are encouraged to coordinate their appointments so that the council includes interdisciplinary palliative care medical, nursing, social work, pharmacy, and spiritual professional expertise; patient and family caregiver advocate representation; and any relevant appointees from the department or other state entities or councils. Membership should include health professionals who have palliative care work experience or expertise in palliative care delivery models in a variety of inpatient, outpatient, and community settings, such as acute care, long-term care, or hospice, and with a variety of populations, including pediatric, youth, and adult patients. It is preferable that at least two councilmembers are board certified hospice and palliative medicine physicians or nurses.

Appointed councilmembers shall serve for a period of three years. The members shall elect a chairperson and vice chairperson from among their membership whose duties shall be established by the council.

The department shall fix a time and place for regular meetings of the council, which shall meet at least twice yearly.

Councilmembers shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be allowed actual and necessary expenses in the performance of their duties. Any legislative members of the council shall receive the allowances provided for in Code Section 28-1-8. Citizen members shall receive a daily expense allowance in the amount specified in subsection (b) of Code Section 45-7-21 as well as the mileage or transportation allowance authorized for state employees. If any members selected to serve on the council are state officials, other than legislative members, or are state employees, they shall receive no compensation for their services on the council but shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as members of the council in the same manner as reimbursements are made in their capacity as state officials or state employees. The funds necessary for the reimbursement of the expenses of state officials, other than legislative members, and state employees shall come from funds appropriated to or otherwise available to their respective departments.

The council shall consult with and advise the department on matters related to the establishment, maintenance, operation, and outcomes evaluation of palliative care initiatives in this state.

The council, no later than October 1, 2019, and annually thereafter, shall submit to the Office of Health Strategy and Coordination a report of its findings and recommendations.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-192

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 155, § 1/HB 509; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 31/HB 323; Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 2-7/HB 186.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in the fourth sentence of subsection (d).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “October 1, 2019, and annually thereafter, shall submit to the Office of Health Strategy and Coordination” for “June 30, 2017, and annually thereafter, shall submit to the Governor and the General Assembly” in subsection (f).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 2-1/HB 186, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This part shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Health Act.’ ”

31-7-193.
Palliative Care Consumer and Professional Information and Education Program.

There is established a state-wide Palliative Care Consumer and Professional Information and Education Program within the department.

The purpose of the Palliative Care Consumer and Professional Information and Education Program shall be to maximize the effectiveness of palliative care initiatives in this state by ensuring that comprehensive and accurate information and education about palliative care is available to the public, health care providers, and health care facilities.

The department shall publish on its website information and resources, including links to external resources, about palliative care for the public, health care providers, and health care facilities. This shall include, but not be limited to, continuing educational opportunities for health care providers; information about palliative care delivery in the home, primary, secondary, and tertiary environments; best practices for palliative care delivery; and consumer educational materials and referral information for palliative care, including hospice.

The department shall consult with the Georgia Palliative Care and Quality of Life Advisory Council in implementing this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-193

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 155, § 1/HB 509.